Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.200

Commission—Qualifications—Oath—Surety bond—Commission term—Electronic records notary public.

(1) An individual qualified under subsection (2) of this section may apply to the director for a commission as a notary public. The applicant shall comply with and provide the information required by rules established by the director and pay any application fee.

(2) An applicant for a commission as a notary public must:

(a) Be at least eighteen years of age;

(b) Be a resident of or have a place of employment or practice in this state;

(c) Be able to read and write English; and

(d) Not be disqualified to receive a commission under RCW 42.45.210.

(3) Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, an applicant for the commission shall execute an oath of office and submit it to the department in the format prescribed by the director in rule.

(4) Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, the applicant for a commission shall submit to the director an assurance in the form of a surety bond in the amount established by the director in rule. The assurance must be issued by a surety or other entity licensed or authorized to write surety bonds in this state. The assurance must be effective for a four-year term or for a term that expires on the date the notary public's commission expires. The assurance must cover acts performed during the term of the notary public's commission and must be in the form prescribed by the director. If a notary public violates law with respect to notaries public in this state, the surety or issuing entity is liable under the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall give at least thirty days' notice to the department before canceling the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall notify the department not later than thirty days after making a payment to a claimant under the assurance. A notary public may perform notarial acts in this state only during the period that a valid assurance is on file with the department.

(5) On compliance with this section, the director shall issue a commission as a notary public to an applicant for a term of four years or for a term that expires on the date of expiration of the assurance, whichever comes first.

(6) A commission to act as a notary public authorizes the notary public to perform notarial acts. The commission does not provide the notary public any immunity or benefit conferred by law of this state on public officials or employees.

(7) An individual qualified under (a) of this subsection may apply to the director for a commission as an electronic records notary public. The applicant shall comply with and provide the information required by rules established by the director and pay the relevant application fee.

(a) An applicant for a commission as an electronic records notary public must hold a commission as notary public.

(b) An electronic records notary public commission may take the form of an endorsement to the notary public commission if deemed appropriate by the director.

[ 2024 c 50 s 10; 2017 c 281 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 50: See note following RCW 18.415.010.